API/spylls/examples/si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 16 Y 74
SFX 16 0 ත්  .
SFX 16 0 යි  .
SFX 16 0 ය  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙක්  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුත්  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකි  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙක්ය  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකු  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුයි  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුය  .
SFX 16 0 ට  .
SFX 16 0 ටත්  .
SFX 16 0 ටයි  .
SFX 16 0 ටය  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුට  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුටත්  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුටයි  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුටය  .
SFX 16 0 ගෙන්  .
SFX 16 0 ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 16 0 ගෙනි  .
SFX 16 0 ගෙන්ය  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුගෙන්ය  .
SFX 16 0 ගේ  .
SFX 16 0 ගේත්  .
SFX 16 0 ගේයි  .
SFX 16 0 ගේය  .
SFX 16 0 ගෙ  .
SFX 16 0 ගෙත්  .
SFX 16 0 ගෙයි  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුගේ  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුගෙ  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුගෙත්  .
SFX 16 0 කෙනෙකුගෙයි  .
SFX 16 0 ලා  .
SFX 16 0 ලාත්  .
SFX 16 0 ලායි  .
SFX 16 0 ලාය  .
SFX 16 0 ල  .
SFX 16 0 ලත්  .
SFX 16 0 ලයි  .
SFX 16 0 ලාට  .
SFX 16 0 ලාටත්  .
SFX 16 0 ලාටයි  .
SFX 16 0 ලාටය  .
SFX 16 0 ලට  .
SFX 16 0 ලටත්  .
SFX 16 0 ලටයි  .
SFX 16 0 ලටය  .
SFX 16 0 ලාගෙන්  .
SFX 16 0 ලාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 16 0 ලාගෙනි  .
SFX 16 0 ලාගෙන්ය  .
SFX 16 0 ලගෙන්  .
SFX 16 0 ලගෙනුත්  .
SFX 16 0 ලගෙනි  .
SFX 16 0 ලගෙන්ය  .
SFX 16 0 ලාගේ  .
SFX 16 0 ලාගේත්  .
SFX 16 0 ලාගේයි  .
SFX 16 0 ලාගේය  .
SFX 16 0 ලගේ  .
SFX 16 0 ලගේත්  .
SFX 16 0 ලගේයි  .
SFX 16 0 ලගේය  .
SFX 16 0 ලගෙ  .
SFX 16 0 ලගෙත්  .
SFX 16 0 ලගෙයි  .
SFX 16 0 ලා   .
SFX 17 Y 58
SFX 17 0 වා  .
SFX 17 0 වාත්   .
SFX 17 0 වායි   .
SFX 17 0 වෙක්  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකුත්  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකි  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකු  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකුයි  .
SFX 17 0 වකු  .
SFX 17 0 වකුත්   .
SFX 17 0 වකුයි  .
SFX 17 0 වාට  .
SFX 17 0 වාටත්  .
SFX 17 0 වාටයි  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකුට  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකුටත්  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකුටයි  .
SFX 17 0 වකුට  .
SFX 17 0 වකුටත්  .
SFX 17 0 වකුටයි  .
SFX 17 0 වාගෙන්  .
SFX 17 0 වාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 17 0 වාගෙනි  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 17 0 වකුගෙන්  .
SFX 17 0 වකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 17 0 වකුගෙනි  .
SFX 17 0 වාගේ  .
SFX 17 0 වාගේත්  .
SFX 17 0 වාගේයි  .
SFX 17 0 වගෙ  .
SFX 17 0 වගෙත්  .
SFX 17 0 වගෙයි  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකුගේ  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 17 0 වෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 17 0 වකුගේ  .
SFX 17 0 වකුගේත්  .
SFX 17 0 වකුගේයි  .
SFX 17 0 ව  .
SFX 17 0 වෝ   .
SFX 17 0 වෝත්   .
SFX 17 0 වෝයි   .
SFX 17 0 වන්   .
SFX 17 0 වනුත්   .
SFX 17 0 වනුයි   .
SFX 17 0 වන්ට  .
SFX 17 0 වන්ටත්  .
SFX 17 0 වන්ටයි  .
SFX 17 0 වන්ගෙන්  .
SFX 17 0 වන්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 17 0 වන්ගෙනි  .
SFX 17 0 වන්ගේ  .
SFX 17 0 වන්ගේත්  .
SFX 17 0 වන්ගේයි  .
SFX 17 0 වනි   .
SFX 18 Y 45
SFX 18 0 ්   .
SFX 18 0 ා   .
SFX 18 0 ාත්   .
SFX 18 0 ායි   .
SFX 18 0 ෙක්  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකි  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකුත්  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකු  .
SFX 18 0 ාට  .
SFX 18 0 ාටත්  .
SFX 18 0 ාටයි  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකුට  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකුටත්  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකුටයි  .
SFX 18 0 ාගෙන්  .
SFX 18 0 ාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 18 0 ාගෙනි  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 18 0 ාගේ  .
SFX 18 0 ාගේත්  .
SFX 18 0 ාගේයි  .
SFX 18 0 ාගෙ  .
SFX 18 0 ාගෙත්  .
SFX 18 0 ාගෙයි  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකුගේ  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 18 0 ෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 18 0 ුන්   .
SFX 18 0 ුනුත්   .
SFX 18 0 ුනුයි   .
SFX 18 0 ුන්ට  .
SFX 18 0 ුන්ටත්  .
SFX 18 0 ුන්ටයි  .
SFX 18 0 ුන්ගෙන්  .
SFX 18 0 ුන්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 18 0 ුන්ගෙනි  .
SFX 18 0 ුන්ගේ  .
SFX 18 0 ුන්ගේත්  .
SFX 18 0 ුන්ගේයි  .
SFX 18 0 ුනි  .
SFX 18 0 ු   .
SFX 18 0 ුත්   .
SFX 18 0 ුයි   .
SFX 19 Y 80
SFX 19 0 යා  .
SFX 19 0 යාත්  .
SFX 19 0 යායි  .
SFX 19 0 යාය  .
SFX 19 0 ය  .
SFX 19 0 යත්  .
SFX 19 0 යයි  .
SFX 19 0 යෙක්  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුත්  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකි  .
SFX 19 0 යෙක්ය  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකු  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුයි  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුය  .
SFX 19 0 යාට  .
SFX 19 0 යාටත්  .
SFX 19 0 යාටයි  .
SFX 19 0 යාටය  .
SFX 19 0 යට  .
SFX 19 0 යටත්  .
SFX 19 0 යටයි  .
SFX 19 0 යටය  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුට  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුටත්  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුටයි  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුටය  .
SFX 19 0 යාගෙන්  .
SFX 19 0 යාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 19 0 යාගෙනි  .
SFX 19 0 යාගෙන්ය  .
SFX 19 0 යගෙන්  .
SFX 19 0 යගෙනුත්  .
SFX 19 0 යගෙනි  .
SFX 19 0 යගෙන්ය  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුගෙන්ය  .
SFX 19 0 යාගේ  .
SFX 19 0 යාගේත්  .
SFX 19 0 යාගේයි  .
SFX 19 0 යාගේය  .
SFX 19 0 යගෙ  .
SFX 19 0 යගෙත්  .
SFX 19 0 යගෙයි  .
SFX 19 0 යගෙය  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුගේ  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 19 0 යෙකුගේය  .
SFX 19 0 යො  .
SFX 19 0 යෝ  .
SFX 19 0 යෝත්  .
SFX 19 0 යෝයි  .
SFX 19 0 යෝය  .
SFX 19 0 යොත්  .
SFX 19 0 යොයි  .
SFX 19 0 යොය  .
SFX 19 0 ීහු  .
SFX 19 0 යන්  .
SFX 19 0 යනුත්  .
SFX 19 0 යනුයි  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ය  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ට  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ටත්  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ටයි  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ටය  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගෙන්  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගෙනි  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගෙන්ය  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගේ  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගේත්  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගේයි  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගේය  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගෙ  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගෙත්  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගෙයි  .
SFX 19 0 යන්ගෙය  .
SFX 19 0 යනි  .
SFX 20 Y 44
SFX 20 0 ා  .
SFX 20 0 ාත්   .
SFX 20 0 ායි   .
SFX 20 0 ෙක්  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකුත්  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකි  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකු  .
SFX 20 0 ාට  .
SFX 20 0 ාටත්  .
SFX 20 0 ාටයි  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකුට  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකුටත්  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකුටයි  .
SFX 20 0 ාගෙන්  .
SFX 20 0 ාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 20 0 ාගෙනි  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 20 0 ාගේ  .
SFX 20 0 ාගේත්  .
SFX 20 0 ාගේයි  .
SFX 20 0 ාගෙ  .
SFX 20 0 ාගෙත්  .
SFX 20 0 ාගෙයි  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගේ  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 20 0 ෝ   .
SFX 20 0 ෝත්   .
SFX 20 0 ෝයි   .
SFX 20 0 න්   .
SFX 20 0 ොත්   .
SFX 20 0 ොයි   .
SFX 20 0 න්ට  .
SFX 20 0 න්ටත්  .
SFX 20 0 න්ටයි  .
SFX 20 0 න්ගෙන්  .
SFX 20 0 න්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 20 0 න්ගෙනි  .
SFX 20 0 න්ගේ  .
SFX 20 0 න්ගේත්  .
SFX 20 0 න්ගේයි  .
SFX 20 0 නි  .
SFX 21 Y 46
SFX 21 0 ු  .
SFX 21 0 ා  .
SFX 21 0 ාත්   .
SFX 21 0 ායි   .
SFX 21 0 ෙක්  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකුත්  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකි  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකු  .
SFX 21 0 ාට  .
SFX 21 0 ාටත්  .
SFX 21 0 ාටයි  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකුට  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකුටත්  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකුටයි  .
SFX 21 0 ාගෙන්  .
SFX 21 0 ාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 21 0 ාගෙනි  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 21 0 ාගේ  .
SFX 21 0 ාගේත්  .
SFX 21 0 ාගේයි  .
SFX 21 0 ගෙ  .
SFX 21 0 ගෙත්  .
SFX 21 0 ගෙයි  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකුගේ  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 21 0 ෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 21 0 ො  .
SFX 21 0 ෝ   .
SFX 21 0 ෝත්   .
SFX 21 0 ෝයි   .
SFX 21 0 න්   .
SFX 21 0 නුත්   .
SFX 21 0 නි   .
SFX 21 0 න්ට  .
SFX 21 0 න්ටත්  .
SFX 21 0 න්ටයි  .
SFX 21 0 න්ගෙන්  .
SFX 21 0 න්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 21 0 න්ගෙනි  .
SFX 21 0 න්ගේ  .
SFX 21 0 න්ගේත්  .
SFX 21 0 න්ගේයි  .
SFX 21 0 නි  .
SFX 22 Y 48
SFX 22 0 ැ  .
SFX 22 0 ා   .
SFX 22 0 ාත්   .
SFX 22 0 ායි   .
SFX 22 0 ෙක්  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකුත්  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකි  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකු  .
SFX 22 0 ාට  .
SFX 22 0 ාටත්  .
SFX 22 0 ාටයි  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකුට  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකුටත්  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකුටයි  .
SFX 22 0 ාගෙන්  .
SFX 22 0 ාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 22 0 ාගෙනි  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 22 0 ාගේ  .
SFX 22 0 ාගේත්  .
SFX 22 0 ාගේයි  .
SFX 22 0 ගෙ  .
SFX 22 0 ගෙත්  .
SFX 22 0 ගෙයි  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගේ  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 22 0 ෝ   .
SFX 22 0 ෝත්   .
SFX 22 0 ෝයි   .
SFX 22 0 ො   .
SFX 22 0 ොත්   .
SFX 22 0 ොයි   .
SFX 22 0 න්   .
SFX 22 0 නුත්   .
SFX 22 0 නුයි   .
SFX 22 0 න්ට  .
SFX 22 0 න්ටත්  .
SFX 22 0 න්ටයි  .
SFX 22 0 න්ගෙන්  .
SFX 22 0 න්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 22 0 න්ගෙනි  .
SFX 22 0 න්ගේ  .
SFX 22 0 න්ගේත්  .
SFX 22 0 න්ගේයි  .
SFX 22 0 නි  .
