API/spylls/examples/si_LK.dic
අගසවු/16
අග්‍රාමාත්‍ය/16
අධිකාරි/16
අධ්‍යක්ෂක/16
අනුනාහිමි/16
අනුශාසක/16
අප්පච්චි/16
අයකැමි/16
ආචාර්ය/16
ආණ්ඩුකාර/16
ඇමති/16
උන්දැ/16
උන්නැහැ/16
උපදිසාපති/16
උපනායක/16
උපාසක/16
ඒකාධිපති/16
කථානායක/16
කුලපති/16
කොන්දොස්තර/16
ගණනායක/16
ගමරාල/16
ගම්බාරෙ/16
ගම්මහේ/16
ගුරුන්නාන්සේ/16
ජනපති/16
ජනාධිපති/16
තණ්ඩලේ/16
තථාගත/16
තමුන්නාන්සෙ/16
තමුන්නැහැ/16
තානාපති/16
දානපති/16
දිසාපති/16
දූ/16
දොස්තර/16
ධනපති/16
ධාතූන්වහන්සේ/16
නංගී/16
නදනිය/16
නාහිමි/16
නැයින/16
නිර්මාතෘ/16
නිලමේ/16
නීතිපති/16
පරිවර්තක/16
පරීක්ෂක/16
පීඨාධිපති/16
පුතා/16
ප්‍රකාශක/16
බත්තනරාළ/16
බිරින්ද/16
භික්ෂූන්වහන්සේ/16
මල්ලි/16
මහත්තැන/16
මිනිබිරිය/16
මුදලාලි/16
යතිනායක/16
රාලහාමි/16
වහන්සේ/16
වෙදරාල/16
සභානායක/16
සූනුව/16
ස්ථානාධිපති/16
හාම්පුතා/16
සර්/16
අම්මි/16
මව/16
අණකරු/17
අන්තු/17
අපරාධකරු/17
අඹහළු/17
අයිතිකරු/17
අලුකුත්තේරු/17
අසරු/17
ආවතේවකරු/17
ඇන්ගෝලියානු/17
ඇමීබා/17
ඉංජිනේරු/17
ඉත්තෑ/17
ඉන්දුනීසියානු/17
ඊවඩු/17
උණපුපුළු/17
උපනු/17
උරුලෑ/17
ඌර්ණායු/17
ඒජන්තකරු/17
ඔසදවටු/17
කගවිසුණු/17
කථාකරු/17
කම්හල්කරු/17
කර්මාන්තකරු/17
කැපකරු/17
කැස්බෑ/17
කුඩහලූ/17
කුඹල්කරු/17
කුලීකරු/17
කෙන්යානු/17
කොලු/17
ක්‍රියාකරු/17
ගණජෙටු/17
ගල්වඩු/17
ගුණමකු/17
ඝොස/17
ජලූකා/17
ජෙන්තේගු/17
තන්වා/17
තරාලූ/17
තැන්පතුකරු/17
තැරැව්කරු/17
දික්දෑ/17
දුවරු/17
නයිජීරියානු/17
නා/17
නියමු/17
නොර්වීජියානු/17
පැට/17
පොවු/17
බොටලේරු/17
මැලේසියානු/17
මු/17
රත්පා/17
රොටිපේරු/17
ලෝකපාලූ/17
වඩු/17
විනිශ්චයකරු/17
වෙන්දේසිකරු/17
සයිකල්කරු/17
සාහිත්‍යකරු/17
සිනමාකරු/17
සීරලූ/17
සොරණු/17
හවුල්කරු/17
හොරදෙටු/17
සයිබීරියානු/17
අසමත/18
ඇත/18
උගත/18
කැනහිල/18
කිඹුල/18
කුඹල/18
සැවුල/18
කුලවත/18
ගුණවත/18
ජගත/18
දුප්පත/18
ධනවත/18
නූගත/18
පිංවත/18
පින්වත/18
පුත/18
පෙම්වත/18
පොහොසත/18
පෝසත/18
බලවත/18
බළල/18
බැතිමත/18
බීමත/18
බුද්ධිමත/18
භවත/18
යුෂ්මත/18
රංකුඹල/18
රසවත/18
වංශවත/18
වවුල/18
වහල/18
වැඩිමල/18
විද්වත/18
වියත/18
ශක්තිමත/18
සත/18
සමත/18
සැදැහැවත/18
සැවුල/18
සිල්වත/18
සුරතල/18
හිතවත/18
හිවල/18
හුරතල/18
කුළුමීම/18
කොක/18
ගොන/18
ගෝන/18
තල්මස/18
තිරිසන/18
දඬුලේන/18
නිකම/18
බබ/18
මයින/18
මිනිස/18
මිනිහ/18
මීම/18
යක/18
ලෙඩ/18
වලස/18
වෙද/18
මිනිස/18
භාග්‍යවත/18
ගිලන/18
අඥ/19
අද්ධික/19
අනභිෂික්ත/19
අන්තගාමි/19
අපෝස්තුලුවර/19
අලගර්ද/19
අසත්‍යවාදි/19
ආචාරවාදි/19
ආදිම/19
ඇට්ටර/19
ඉහඬ/19
උපාධිධර/19
ඔපරේටර්වර/19
කත්කාර/19
කවඩි/19
කැරලිකාර/19
කුලපුත‍්‍ර/19
කොරලි/19
ඛග්ගගාහක/19
ගඳ/19
ගැහැවි/19
ග‍්‍රාමික/19
චෝළ/19
ජම්මක්කාර/19
ජ්‍යේෂ්ඨතම/19
තර්කශාස්ත‍්‍රඥ/19
තොමන/19
දළසඳ/19
දුබල/19
දොස්තර/19
නගරසභික/19
නාස්තිකාර/19
නිර්මාපක/19
නොංඩි/19
පරපීඩාකාමි/19
පශ්චිම/19
පිටරැටි/19
පේනකාර/19
ප‍්‍රතිනිධි/19
ප‍්‍රයෝජ්‍ය/19
ඵලස්ථ/19
බිඩාල/19
භින්නක/19
මද/19
මහමදික/19
මැර/19
මූසිල/19
යෝග්‍ය/19
රාජතාන්ත්‍රික/19
ලඝුලේඛක/19
ලෝකෝත්තර/19
වයෝවෘද්ධ/19
වාදකාර/19
වැහිලිහිණි/19
විනෂ්ට/19
විශාරද/19
වෙඩික්කාර/19
ව්‍යාඛ්‍යාකාර/19
ශාස්ත‍්‍රවේදි/19
ශ්‍රේෂ්ඨතම/19
සඞ්ඝ/19
සභාපති/19
සලඹ/19
සාවාල/19
සුභග/19
සේවායෝජක/19
හුලවාලි/19
අතහරින්න/20
අදහන්න/20
අපුල්ලන්න/20
අඹරවන්න/20
අවුස්සන්න/20
අහුරන්න/20
ඇඹරෙන්න/20
ඇහැරෙන්න/20
ඉඳින්න/20
ඉසින්න/20
උපදින්න/20
උසුලන්න/20
එසවෙන්න/20
ඔතන්න/20
කණින්න/20
කලතන්න/20
කැකෑරෙන්න/20
කියන්න/20
කෙලෙසෙන්න/20
ගරන්න/20
ගාටන්න/20
ගැහෙන්න/20
ගෙරවෙන්න/20
ගොරවන්න/20
තවන්න/20
තියන්න/20
තෝරන්න/20
දරන්න/20
දැමෙන්න/20
දිනවන්න/20
දුරලන්න/20
නංවන්න/20
නවතන්න/20
නළියන්න/20
නෑසෙන්න/20
පටලැවෙන්න/20
පවතින්න/20
පාහන්න/20
පැසසෙන්න/20
පිඹින්න/20
පිරිහෙන්න/20
පිළිසිඳෙන්න/20
පෙඟවෙන්න/20
පොපියන්න/20
බලන්න/20
බැලෙන්න/20
මඩවන්න/20
මැඩවෙන්න/20
මුලිනුපුටන්න/20
රක්කවන්න/20
රිදවන්න/20
ලුහුබඳින්න/20
වද්දන්න/20
වසන්න/20
වැජඹෙන්න/20
වැළකෙන්න/20
විමසන්න/20
වෙළන්න/20
සපුරන්න/20
සැඟවෙන්න/20
සිතන්න/20
හකුළන්න/20
හරින්න/20
හැපෙන්න/20
හිතෙන්න/20
හොල්ලන්න/20
ඔළුබක්ක/21
කටබක්ක/21
කිණිතුල්ල/21
කීනබල්ල/21
කොල්ල/21
ගමලද්ද/21
ගම්ලද්ද/21
ගොපල්ල/21
ගොපොල්ල/21
බල්ල/21
දතසුද්ද/21
ලද්ද/21
බස්ස/21
බියසුල්ල/21
බූවල්ල/21
බේබද්ද/21
මහදැනමුත්ත/21
මහල්ල/21
මුරපල්ල/21
මුවපොල්ල/21
යක්කුරුල්ල/21
යවපල්ල/21
රටලද්ද/21
රෑබදුල්ල/21
හුරුල්ල/21
දෙමහල්ල/21
දෙමාල්ල/21
ගල්කුරුල්ල/21
මැස්ස/21
බෙල්ල/21
කණමැස්ස/21
කප්පිත්ත/21
ගම්වැස්ස/21
ගැත්ත/21
පෙත්ත/21
වැද්ද/21
දියවැද්ද/21
දෙස්ස/21
නුවණැත්ත/21
පොකිරිස්ස/21
පොඩිත්ත/21
බඩපිස්ස/21
බලුගැත්ත/21
බිල්ල/21
මැක්ක/21
යක්දෙස්ස/21
රටවැස්ස/21
ලේඬිත්ත/21
හක්බෙල්ල/21
අඟුටුමිට්ට/21
ඉබ්බ/21
හත්වැන්න/21
අමුත්ත/21
කැරපොත්ත/21
කූඩැල්ල/21
ගරිල්ල/21
ගෙම්බ/21
ගෝරිල්ල/21
දිළින්ද/21
නිලමැස්ස/21
බයගුල්ල/21
බියගුල්ල/21
යමපල්ල/21
ලොක්ක/21
වැඩිමහල්ල/21
සුදුස්ස/21
අංකූර/22
අඬුබහුර/22
ඇදුර/22
ඉටුමිතුර/22
ඉණිකුණ/22
උකුණ/22
කණ/22
කපුට/22
කමුර/22
කඹුර/22
කිඳුර/22
කුකුළ/22
කුණ/22
කුරර/22
කූට/22
කූර/22
කෙවුළ/22
කෙහුට/22
ගරුඩ/22
ගහැදුර/22
ගිනිසුර/22
ගුර/22
ගුරුළ/22
පසමිතුර/22
පිඹුර/22
පොතේගුර/22
පොරණැදුර/22
බකමූණ/22
බබුර/22
බමුණ/22
බඹුර/22
බිහිර/22
මකුණ/22
මගුර/22
මසුර/22
මහමුහුණ/22
මහැදුර/22
මිතුර/22
මුකුර/22
මුනුබුර/22
මෙහෙසුර/22
මොකදුර/22
මොකැදුර/22
යකදුර/22
යකැදුර/22
රබන්කුකුළ/22
රියදුර/22
රියැදුර/22
වඳුර/22
වළිකුකුළ/22
විනිසුර/22
වෙදැදුර/22
සතුර/22
සමුණ/22
සිකුර/22
සුරදෙට/22
සුහුණ/22
සෙනසුර/22
සොයුර/22
සොහොයුර/22
සොහොවුර/22
හතුර/22
හිතමිතුර/22
ළමය/22
